Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.460

Office of cybersecurity—Catalog of services and functions—Report.

(1) By July 1, 2022, the office of cybersecurity, in collaboration with state agencies, shall develop a catalog of cybersecurity services and functions for the office of cybersecurity to perform and submit a report to the legislature and governor. The report must include, but not be limited to:

(a) Cybersecurity services and functions to include in the office of cybersecurity's catalog of services that should be performed by the office of cybersecurity;

(b) Core capabilities and competencies of the office of cybersecurity;

(c) Security functions which should remain within agency information technology security programs;

(d) A recommended model for accountability of agency security programs to the office of cybersecurity; and

(e) The cybersecurity services and functions required to protect confidential information transacted, stored, or processed in the state's information technology systems and infrastructure that is specifically protected from disclosure by state or federal law and for which strict handling requirements are required.

(2) The office of cybersecurity shall update and publish its catalog of services and performance metrics on a biennial basis. The office of cybersecurity shall use data and information provided from agency security programs to inform the updates to its catalog of services and performance metrics.

(3) To ensure alignment with enterprise information technology security strategy, the office of cybersecurity shall develop a process for reviewing and evaluating agency proposals for additional cybersecurity services consistent with RCW 43.105.255.

[ 2021 c 291 s 2.]